Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-905
Members; expenses; support of conference; appropriation by Legislature.

There may be appropriated a sum sufficient to reimburse members of the Commission on Uniform State Laws for their necessary expenses in performing the duties of their offices as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177, to defray the cost of printing the commission's reports, and to make a contribution for the purposes set forth in section 49-904 on behalf of this state to the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

Laws 1951, c. 166, § 5, p. 650;

Laws 1957, c. 212, § 1, p. 747;

Laws 1961, c. 245, § 1, p. 730;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 87;

Laws 1998, LB 1158, § 2.